Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-1031.02
School district; department; reports.

(1) For school fiscal year 2023-24 and each school fiscal year thereafter, each school district shall submit a report to the department that includes the following information:

(a) The amount by which the school district reduced its property tax request for such school fiscal year, if any such reduction occurred; and

(b) Other information as required by the department.

(2) The department shall compile the information received from school districts under subsection (1) of this section and shall submit a comprehensive report of all such information annually to the Governor, the chairperson of the Education Committee of the Legislature, and the Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the committee and the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2023, LB583, § 10.